Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6394.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1f. If a provision of this act conflicts with a provision of the solicitation and oversight partnership act, the provision of the solicitation and oversight partnership act controls. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6393 (request no. H06828'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.